apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="autokel/ias__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ias</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>ias<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abejoto/jas__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jas</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jo</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jui</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ją</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ju</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jyje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>juje</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jy</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jin</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jau</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jų</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jams</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jus</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jais</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>juose</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>jisna</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jai</l>
          <r>jas<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abejokl/is__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iui</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>į</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iu</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yje</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ių</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iams</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ius</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iais</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iuose</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>isna</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iai</l>
          <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="elnias"><i>eln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kelias"><i>kel</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svečias"><i>sveč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velnias"><i>veln</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kovotojas"><i>kovoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasekėjas"><i>pasekė</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="statytojas"><i>statyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vykdytojas"><i>vykdyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dirvožemis"><i>dirvožem</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaušelis"><i>kaušel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modulis"><i>modul</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pokalbis"><i>pokalb</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandėlis"><i>sandėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tolis"><i>tol</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šokis"><i>šok</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autokelias"><i>autokel</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kurčias"><i>kurč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mulčias"><i>mulč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaikiščias"><i>vaikišč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šalčias"><i>šalč</i><par n="autokel/ias__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artojas"><i>arto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brokuotojas"><i>brokuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="davinėtojas"><i>davinėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duoneliautojas"><i>duoneliauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faneruotojas"><i>faneruoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="galvotojas"><i>galvoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gromuliuotojas"><i>gromuliuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išjodinėtojas"><i>išjodinėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapstytojas"><i>kapstyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klaidintojas"><i>klaidinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kvaršintojas"><i>kvaršinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lupikautojas"><i>lupikauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="masintojas"><i>masinto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mylėtojas"><i>mylėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paistytojas"><i>paistyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pašytojas"><i>pašyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piktažodžiautojas"><i>piktažodžiauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pozuotojas"><i>pozuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protokoluotojas"><i>protokoluoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rašinėtojas"><i>rašinėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rėžytojas"><i>rėžyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sienojas"><i>sieno</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slaugytojas"><i>slaugyto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stovyklautojas"><i>stovyklauto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tinkuotojas"><i>tinkuoto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaikštinėtojas"><i>vaikštinėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veldėtojas"><i>veldėto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įgaliotojas"><i>įgalioto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žabotojas"><i>žaboto</i><par n="abejoto/jas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="angliavandenis"><i>angliavanden</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apdiržėlis"><i>apdiržėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ateivis"><i>ateiv</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aviamodelis"><i>aviamodel</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bedarbis"><i>bedarb</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dejuoklis"><i>dejuokl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="džioviklis"><i>džiovikl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grėbis"><i>grėb</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jautakis"><i>jautak</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kibis"><i>kib</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kyšis"><i>kyš</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="megztinis"><i>megztin</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nesusivaldėlis"><i>nesusivaldėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padžiūvėlis"><i>padžiūvėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pašiaušėlis"><i>pašiaušėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podūkis"><i>podūk</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="priklydėlis"><i>priklydėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raguolis"><i>raguol</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saviškis"><i>savišk</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spartuolis"><i>spartuol</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svyruonėlis"><i>svyruonėl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trumpasparnis"><i>trumpasparn</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vaiskrūmis"><i>vaiskrūm</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viriklis"><i>virikl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įžiemis"><i>įžiem</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šuteklis"><i>šutekl</i><par n="abejokl/is__n"/></e>
